North Carolina, session 2025, HB304.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Iredell-Statesville Schools Board of Education is permitted to
have one school in the Iredell-Statesville School Administrative Unit operate as a Trades High
School. For purposes of this section, a "Trades High School" is a school serving students in
grades 10 through 12 operating under Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, except for the
flexibilities provided by this act, that focuses primarily on Career and Technical Education.
SECTION 1.(b) The Trades High School is exempt from the following statutes:
(1) Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.
(2) Part 1D of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.
SECTION 1.(c) The Trades High School shall employ and establish the terms of any
new or renewed contract with necessary school administrators and teachers to perform the
particular service for which they are employed in the school, except for those teachers employed
pursuant to G.S. 115C-325. At least fifty percent (50%) of the teachers in a school shall hold
teacher licenses. All teachers who are teaching in the core subject areas of mathematics, science,
social studies, and language arts shall be college graduates. The Trades High School also may
employ necessary employees who are not required to hold teacher licenses to perform duties
other than teaching and may contract for other services. All teachers hired by the Trades High
School who are not licensed as a teacher by the State shall complete preservice training, which
may be offered through an educator preparation program or by a local school administrative unit,
in all of the following areas prior to beginning instruction:
(1) The identification and education of children with disabilities.
(2) Positive management of student behavior.
(3) Effective communication for defusing and de-escalating disruptive or
dangerous behavior.
(4) Safe and appropriate use of seclusion and restraint.
SECTION 1.(d) The Iredell-Statesville Schools Board of Education shall develop
criteria for an alternative Trades Diploma. For purposes of this section, a "Trades Diploma" is
the diploma to be awarded to students graduating from the Trades High School who meet the
criteria set by the Iredell-Statesville Schools Board of Education. Students shall obtain at least
22 credits to earn a Trades Diploma. The Iredell-Statesville Schools Board of Education shall
submit a list of requirements for students to obtain a Trades Diploma to the State Board of
*H304-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Education prior to the start of the first school year the Iredell-Statesville Schools Board of
Education intends to offer Trade Diplomas.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 304-First Edition